South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4769.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-3-14970 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-3-14970.  (A) The department may issue the following special license plates reflective of military service for private passenger vehicles and motorcycles to active or prior service members associated with the following military components or designations: (1) Veteran or Veteran wheelchair if the registrant qualifies for handicapped parking pursuant to Section 56-3-1910(H) (2) Female Veteran or Female Veteran wheelchair if the registrant qualifies for handicapped parking pursuant to Section 56-3-1910(H) (3) Combat-Related Disabled Veteran-the registrant must have a combat-related disability as evidenced by a letter from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs defining a combat and operations-related disability (4) Army (5) Marine Corps (6) Navy (7) Air Force (8) Coast Guard (9) US Space Force (10) National Guard- Army (11) National Guard- Air (12) National Guard- Retired (13) US Military Reserve- Army (14) US Military Reserve- Marine Corps (15) US Military Reserve- Navy (16) US Military Reserve- Air Force (17) US Military Reserve- Coast Guard (18) US Armed Forces Retired (19) State Guard (20) Submarine Veteran. (B) The qualifying active or prior service member must be one of the registrants of the vehicle. No more than three license plates may be issued to the award recipient. License plates for designation specified in subsection (A) are subject to the regular motor vehicle registration fee contained in Article 5, Chapter 3, Title 56 but no additional specialty plate fee. These special license plates must be issued or revalidated for a biennial period which expires twenty-four months from the month they are issued. (C) The application for a special license plate reflective of a branch of service must include official military documentation (a DD-214, NGB Form 22, or official orders) that the registrant is an active or prior service member of that branch of service pursuant to the requirements in Section 56-1-140(B)(1-3). The application for a special license plate reflective of a veteran's designation also must meet the specifications in Section 56-1-140(B)(1-3). (D) License plates authorized under subsection (A) are exempt from the provisions contained in Section 56-3-8100. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----